Oklahoma, session 2025, SB682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 278, O.S.L.


2023, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 277, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S.


Supp. 2024, Section 28-101), is amended to read as follows:


Section 28-101. A. As used in the Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax


Credit Act:


1. “Commission” means the Oklahoma Tax Commission;


2. “Curriculum” means a complete course of study for a


particular content area or grade level;


3. “Department” means the State Department of Education;



Req. No. 715 Page 1


4. “Education service provider” means a person, business,


public school district, public charter school, magnet school, or


organization that provides educational goods and/or services to


eligible students in this state;


5. “Eligible student” means a resident of this state who is


eligible to enroll in a public school in this state. Eligible


student shall include a student who is enrolled in and attends or is


expected to enroll in a private school in this state accredited by


the State Board of Education or another accrediting association or a


student who is educated pursuant to the other means of education


exception provided for in subsection A of Section 10-105 of this


title;


6. “Qualified expense” for the purpose of claiming the credit


authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section means


tuition and fees at a private school in this state accredited by the


State Board of Education or another accrediting association.


Provided, the amount of tuition and fees considered a qualified


expense pursuant to this paragraph shall not include tuition and


fees paid with any scholarship or tuition and fees discounted or


otherwise reduced by the school;


7. “Qualified expense” for the purpose of claiming the credit


authorized by paragraph 2 of subsection C of this section means the


following expenditures:



Req. No. 715 Page 2


a. tuition and fees for nonpublic learning programs,


online or in person,


b. academic tutoring services provided by an individual


or a private academic tutoring facility,


c. textbooks, curriculum, or other instructional


materials including, but not limited to, supplemental


materials or associated online instruction required by


an education service provider, and


d. fees for nationally standardized assessments


including, but not limited to, assessments used to


determine college admission and advanced placement


examinations as well as tuition and fees for tutoring


or preparatory courses for the assessments; and


8. “Taxpayer” means a biological or adoptive parent,


grandparent, aunt, uncle, legal guardian, custodian, or other person


with legal authority to act on behalf of an eligible student.


B. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax


Credit Program to provide an income tax credit to a taxpayer for


qualified expenses to support the education of eligible students in


this state.


C. For the tax year 2024 and subsequent tax years, and fiscal


year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years, there shall be allowed


against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes a credit for any Oklahoma taxpayer who incurs a qualified

Req. No. 715 Page 3


expense on behalf of an eligible student, to be administered subject


to the following amounts:


1. If the eligible student attends a private school in this


state accredited by the State Board of Education or another


accrediting association, the annual maximum credit amount for tax


year 2024, fiscal year 2026, and each subsequent fiscal year shall


be:


a. Seven Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) or the


amount of tuition and fees for the private school,


whichever is less, if the combined adjusted gross


income of the parents or legal guardians of the


eligible student during the second preceding tax year


does not exceed Seventy-five Thousand Dollars


($75,000.00),


b. Seven Thousand Dollars ($7,000.00) or the amount of


tuition and fees for the private school, whichever is


less, if the combined adjusted gross income of the


parents or legal guardians of the eligible student


during the second preceding tax year is more than


Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00) but does


not exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($150,000.00),


c. Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($6,500.00) or the


amount of tuition and fees for the private school,

Req. No. 715 Page 4


whichever is less, if the combined adjusted gross


income of the parents or legal guardians of the


eligible student during the second preceding tax year


is more than One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($150,000.00) but does not exceed Two Hundred Twenty-


five Thousand Dollars ($225,000.00),


d. Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00) or the amount of


tuition and fees for the private school, whichever is


less, if the combined adjusted gross income of the


parents or legal guardians of the eligible student


during the second preceding tax year is more than Two


Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($225,000.00) but


does not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars


($250,000.00), or


e. Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or the amount of


tuition and fees for the private school, whichever is


less, if the combined adjusted gross income of the


parents or legal guardians of the eligible student


during the second preceding tax year is more than Two


Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00);


2. For tax year 2024 and subsequent tax years, the maximum


credit amount shall be One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) in qualified


expenses per eligible student in each tax year if the eligible


student is educated pursuant to the other means of education

Req. No. 715 Page 5


exception provided for in subsection A of Section 10-105 of this


title. To claim the credit, the taxpayer shall submit to the


Commission receipts for qualified expenses as defined by paragraph 7


of subsection A of this section;


3. If the eligible student attends a private school in this


state, accredited by the State Board of Education or another


accrediting association, that exclusively serves students


experiencing homelessness, the credit amount shall be Seven Thousand


Five Hundred Dollars ($7,500.00) or the amount of the cost to


educate the eligible student at the private school, whichever is


less;


4. If the eligible student attends a private school in this


state, accredited by the State Board of Education or another


accrediting association, that primarily serves financially


disadvantaged students, the credit amount shall be the maximum


credit amount authorized by paragraph 1 of this subsection or the


amount of the cost to educate the eligible student at the private


school, whichever is less. The cost to educate the eligible student


shall be equal to the average cost to educate all students attending


the private school, which shall be calculated by dividing the


private school’s total expenditures in the previous year by the


total enrollment in the previous school year. A private school


shall be deemed to be primarily serving financially disadvantaged


students if ninety percent (90%) of the private school’s admissions

Req. No. 715 Page 6


are based on enrolling students whose gross family income is two


hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty threshold or


below;


5. The taxpayer shall retain all receipts of qualified expenses


as proof of the amounts paid each tax year the credit is claimed and


shall submit them to the Commission upon request;


6. If the credit exceeds the tax imposed by Section 2355 of


Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the excess amount shall be


refunded to the taxpayer; and


7. Credits claimed by a taxpayer pursuant to the provisions of


this section shall not be used to offset or pay the following:


a. delinquent tax liability,


b. accrued penalty or interest from the failure to file a


report or return,


c. accrued penalty or interest from the failure to pay a


state tax within the statutory period allowed for its


payment,


d. tax liability of the taxpayer from any prior tax year,


or


e. any debt, unpaid fine, final judgment, or claim filed


with the Commission by a qualified entity as defined


in Section 205.2 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


D. 1. a. For tax year 2024, the total amount of credits


authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this

Req. No. 715 Page 7


section shall not exceed One Hundred Fifty Million


Dollars ($150,000,000.00).


b. For the period of January 1, 2025, through June 30,


2025, the total amount of credits authorized by


paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section shall not


exceed One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00).


The Commission shall not require a taxpayer who


received a credit pursuant to paragraph 1 of


subsection C of this section in tax year 2024 to


reapply for a credit payable during the period


described in this subparagraph. The Commission shall


base the credit amount payable for the spring 2025 on


the fall 2024 installment disbursement payment amount.


c. For fiscal year 2026 and subsequent fiscal years, the


total amount of credits authorized by paragraph 1 of


subsection C of this section shall not exceed Two


Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00).


2. For tax year 2025 and subsequent tax years, the total amount


of credits authorized by paragraph 2 of subsection C of this section


shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00).


E. The Commission shall prescribe applications for the purposes


of claiming the credits authorized by the Oklahoma Parental Choice


Tax Credit Act and a deadline by which applications shall be


submitted. A taxpayer claiming the credit authorized by paragraph 1

Req. No. 715 Page 8


of subsection C of this section shall submit an application


prescribed by the Commission to receive the credit in two


installments, each of which shall be half of the expected amount of


tuition and fees for the private school based on the enrollment


verification form submitted pursuant to this subsection, but in no


event shall an installment payment exceed the amount of the credit


authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section.


Provided, if the credit is for an eligible student who only attends


one semester of the school year, the credit shall be received in one


installment which shall be an amount equal to the expected amount of


tuition and fees for the semester, but in no event shall the


installment payment exceed half the amount of the credit authorized


by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section. If an eligible


taxpayer provides documentation on the application that he or she is


a recipient of income-based government benefits including the


Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), Temporary


Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), or SoonerCare, the eligible


taxpayer shall not be required to provide additional income


verification. A taxpayer claiming the credit authorized by


paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section shall submit to the


Commission an enrollment verification form from the private school


in which the eligible student is enrolled or is expected to enroll


with the tuition and fees to be charged the taxpayer for the


applicable school year. In reviewing applications submitted by

Req. No. 715 Page 9


eligible taxpayers to determine whether they qualify for a credit


authorized by paragraph 1 of subsection C of this section, the


Commission shall give first preference in making installments to


taxpayers who qualify pursuant to subparagraphs a and b of paragraph


of subsection C of this section. For credits issued in the 2025-


2026 school year and subsequent school years, the application period


shall open on February 15 prior to the beginning of each school


year. For any eligible student whose parents or legal guardians


have a combined adjusted gross income that does not exceed One


Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00), applications shall be


submitted to the Commission within the first sixty (60) days of the


opening of the application period to receive priority consideration.


For students enrolled in the full school year, the credit shall be


paid in two installments, one per school semester, to be paid no


later than August 30 and January 15, each of which shall be half of


the total expected amount of tuition and fees on the enrollment


verification form submitted pursuant to this subsection.


F. In the event there are more applications submitted by


eligible taxpayers for a credit authorized by paragraph 1 of


subsection C of this section than available credits pursuant to


subsection D of this section, then the Commission shall give first


preference in authorizing credits for eligible students of taxpayers


who qualify pursuant to subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 1 of



Req. No. 715 Page 10


subsection C of this section and have received the credit in the


prior year.


G. Taxpayers claiming the credit shall:


1. Only claim the credit for qualified expenses as defined in


paragraphs 6 and 7 of subsection A of this section to provide an


education for an eligible student;


2. Ensure no other person is claiming a credit for the eligible


student;


3. Not claim the credit for an eligible student who enrolls as


a full-time student in a public school district, public charter


school, public virtual charter school, or magnet school;


4. Comply with rules and requirements established by the


Commission for administration of the Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax


Credit Program; and


5. Notify the Commission not later than thirty (30) days after


the date on which the eligible student:


a. enrolls in a public school, including an open-


enrollment charter school,


b. enrolls in a nonaccredited private school,


c. graduates from high school, or


d. is no longer utilizing credits authorized by paragraph


of subsection C of this section for any reason.


H. Eligible students may accept a scholarship from the Lindsey


Nicole Henry Scholarships for Students with Disabilities Program

Req. No. 715 Page 11


created by Section 13-101.2 of this title while participating in the


Oklahoma Parental Choice Tax Credit Program.


I. 1. The Commission shall have the authority to conduct an


audit or contract for the auditing of receipts for qualified


expenses submitted pursuant to paragraph 2 of subsection C of this


section.


2. The Commission shall be authorized to recapture the credits


otherwise authorized by the provisions of the Oklahoma Parental


Choice Tax Credit Act on a prorated basis if an audit conducted


pursuant to this subsection shows that the credit was claimed for


expenditures that were not qualified expenses or it finds that the


taxpayer has claimed an eligible student who no longer attends a


private school or has enrolled in a public school in the state.


Provided, the Commission shall not be authorized to recapture the


credits for an eligible student for the sole reason that the student


no longer attends a private school or has enrolled in a public


school in this state, if the student completes at least one semester


of the school year at a private school as an eligible student.


3. The Commission shall be authorized to reallocate credits to


the next eligible taxpayer in line when a taxpayer, on behalf of an


eligible student in the program, chooses not to participate, is no


longer eligible to participate, or chooses to forgo participation in


the program for any reason.



Req. No. 715 Page 12


4. The Commission shall provide notification of approval status


to applicants within thirty (30) days of closure of the application


window. Notice to applicants with an eligible student, whose


parents or legal guardians have a combined adjusted gross income of


more than One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00), shall be


sent within thirty (30) days or no later than thirty (30) days after


the last day of the priority consideration period.


J. In the event of a failure of revenue pursuant to the


Oklahoma State Finance Act, the tax credits otherwise authorized in


subsection C of this section shall be reduced proportionately to the


reduction in the amount of money appropriated to the State Board of


Education for the financial support of public schools for the fiscal


year in which the failure of revenue occurs.


K. The Commission shall make available on its website to be


updated monthly:


1. The total amount of credits claimed each year pursuant to


paragraphs 1 through 4 of subsection C of this section;


2. The amount of credits claimed and number of students awarded


each fiscal year pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection C of this


section disaggregated by income categories;


3. The total amount of credits claimed and number of students


awarded who attended a public school in the semester immediately


preceding the school year for which the application is made each


year; and

Req. No. 715 Page 13


4. The total number of applications denied and total amount of


credits the denied applications represent for each fiscal year.


L. Credits received pursuant to the Oklahoma Parental Choice


Tax Credit Act shall not constitute taxable income to a taxpayer who


received the credit on behalf of an eligible student.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-715 QD 1/19/2025 5:41:18 AM

































Req. No. 715 Page 14